North Dakota statutes. TITLE 58 Townships
CHAPTER 58-06 Board of Township Supervisors

58-06-01.
General powers and duties of board of township supervisors.

The board of township supervisors has the following powers and duties:

To manage and control the affairs of the township not committed to other township officers.

To draw orders on the township treasury for the disbursement of township funds.

To recommend to the electors the expenditure of a stated amount for the purpose of purchasing building sites, and for purchasing, erecting, locating, or removing any building, township hall, or library building for the use and benefit of the township.

When a city which is laid out into streets is included within the limits of the township, to cause improvements to be made in any street that may be needed as a highway if the city neglects to make the improvements.

To prosecute all actions upon bonds given to it or previous boards.

To sue for and collect all penalties and forfeitures incurred by any officer or inhabitant of the township when no other provision is made.

To prosecute any action for trespass committed on any public enclosure, highway, or property belonging to the township.

To pay all money collected by it for the township to the township treasurer.

To levy the annual taxes for the ensuing calendar year as voted at the annual township meeting.

To grant to any person the right of way for the erection of telephone lines, electric light systems, water or wastewater systems, or gas or oil pipeline systems over, under, or upon public grounds, streets, alleys, or highways.

To appoint the township overseer of highways.

To purchase road machinery and tools.

To request assistance from a county or district board of health or the department of environmental quality.

To perpetuate survey markings.

To erect and maintain guideposts on the highways and other ways within the township at such places as are necessary or convenient for the direction of travelers.

To examine, compare, and balance the books of the township clerk and the treasurer at the annual meeting in March of each year.

To pay all or a part of the cost of electricity used in electrically lighting the streets of cities located within the township.

To insure the township’s property which is not required to be insured against loss by fire or tornado by the state fire and tornado fund in a stock or mutual fire insurance company or in the state fire and tornado fund.

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 559, § 7.

To submit a budget for the township at its annual meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 1, §§ 50, 60 to 62, 106; 1895, ch. 47, § 3; R.C. 1895, §§ 1970, 2581, 2598 to 2600, 2646; S.L. 1899, ch. 140, § 1; 1899, ch. 156, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 1115a, 1970, 2581, 2598 to 2600, 2646, 3225a; S.L. 1903, ch. 196, § 1; 1905, ch. 52, § 1; 1905, ch. 180, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 1406, 2468, 3116, 3133 to 3135, 3182, 3187, 4633; S.L. 1907, ch. 255, § 2; 1909, ch. 223, § 2; 1911, ch. 288, § 1; 1913, ch. 59, § 9; 1913, ch. 86, § 1; 1913, ch. 92, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 1979, 1990m, 3348, 4175, 4192 to 4194, 4242, 4247, 4286, 5144; S.L. 1915, ch. 260, § 1; 1925, ch. 188, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 1990m, 5144; S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 8; 1931, ch. 201, § 1; 1937, ch. 10, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 58-0601; S.L. 1959, ch. 405, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 261; 1981, ch. 91, § 62; 1985, ch. 158, § 2; 1985, ch. 317, § 80; 1987, ch. 733, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 737, § 4; 1999, ch. 242, § 6; 2017, ch. 199, § 64, effective April 29, 2019.

Note.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.

Cross-References.

Beer or liquor licenses, see N.D.C.C. § 5-01-07.

Equalization of assessments, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-09.

Examination of records of officers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-04-15.

Fence viewers, see N.D.C.C. § 47-26-02.

Fire and tornado insurance on property, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-22.

Fires, contract for prevention and extinguishment, see N.D.C.C. § 18-06-10.

Gopher extermination, see N.D.C.C. § 4-16-04.

Oath of office, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

Road and drainage construction standards, see N.D.C.C. § 24-06-26.1.

Road machinery, purchase of, see N.D.C.C. §§ 24-06-02, 24-06-07.

Roads, supervision over, see N.D.C.C. § 24-06-01.

Road tax, expenditure, see N.D.C.C. § 24-06-19.

Term of office, see N.D.C.C. § 58-05-02.

Vacancies filled by board, see N.D.C.C. § 58-05-16.

58-06-02.
Compensation of supervisors.

A township supervisor is entitled to receive as compensation for services up to sixty dollars a day for each day necessarily devoted to the work of a supervisor’s office not exceeding two thousand dollars in a calendar year. The electors of the township shall establish the daily compensation rate for township supervisors at each annual township meeting. Additional compensation over two thousand dollars may be provided for reimbursement of expenses as provided in section 44-08-04 and for mileage as provided in section 54-06-09 for each mile [1.61 kilometers] necessarily traveled in the performance of a supervisor’s duties.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 1, § 86; R.C. 1895, § 2624; R.C. 1899, § 2624; R.C. 1905, § 3160; C.L. 1913, § 4220; S.L. 1917, ch. 236, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 4220; R.C. 1943, § 58-0602; S.L. 1947, ch. 366, § 1; 1957, ch. 369, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 58-0602; S.L. 1959, ch. 325, § 2; 1973, ch. 494, § 1; 1975, ch. 90, § 5; 1979, ch. 630, § 1; 2001, ch. 554, § 1; 2007, ch. 548, § 1; 2011, ch. 489, § 1.

58-06-03.
Regular meetings of board of township supervisors — When held.

The board of township supervisors shall hold regular meetings on the second Tuesday in March, on the fourth Tuesday in March, and on the second Monday in June of each year, except that in the discretion of the township supervisors the meetings provided for the second Tuesday and fourth Tuesday in March may be held on the same day as the annual township meeting as provided in section 58-04-01.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 155, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 2591; S.L. 1897, ch. 140; 1899, ch. 160, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 2591; S.L. 1901, ch. 205, § 1; 1903, ch. 200, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 3126; C.L. 1913, § 4185; R.C. 1943, § 58-0603; S.L. 1953, ch. 341, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 58-0603.

Cross-References.

Governmental meetings open to public, see N.D.C.C. § 44-04-19.

58-06-04.
May hold adjourned and special meetings.

The board of township supervisors may adjourn from time to time and in cases of emergency may hold special meetings on the call of the township clerk.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 155, § 6; R.C. 1895, § 2596; R.C. 1899, § 2596; R.C. 1905, § 3131; C.L. 1913, § 4190; R.C. 1943, § 58-0604; S.L. 1999, ch. 531, § 1.

58-06-05.
Where meetings of board of supervisors held.

The regular meetings of the board of township supervisors must be held at the office of the township clerk or at the usual place for holding the annual township meetings if there is one.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 155, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 2592; R.C. 1899, § 2592; R.C. 1905, § 3127; C.L. 1913, § 4186; R.C. 1943, § 58-0605; S.L. 1985, ch. 660, § 2.

58-06-06.
Quorum of the board.

Two of the supervisors constitute a quorum for the performance of the duties of the board of township supervisors except when otherwise provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 1, § 63; R.C. 1895, § 2601; R.C. 1899, § 2601; R.C. 1905, § 3136; C.L. 1913, § 4195; R.C. 1943, § 58-0606.

58-06-07.
Board of township supervisors to elect chairman.

At its first regular meeting following the annual township meeting, the board of township supervisors shall elect one of its members as chairman. The chairman shall serve for a term of one year.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 1, § 12; R.C. 1895, § 2541; R.C. 1899, § 2541; S.L. 1905, ch. 182, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 3062; S.L. 1911, ch. 306, § 1; 1913, ch. 90, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 4087; R.C. 1943, § 58-0607.

58-06-08.
Approve bonds of township officers.

At its first meeting after the election of township officers, the chairman of the board of township supervisors shall approve the bonds of township officers and the officers immediately shall enter upon the discharge of their duties.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 155, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 2594; R.C. 1899, § 2594; R.C. 1905, § 3129; C.L. 1913, § 4188; R.C. 1943, § 58-0608; S.L. 1953, ch. 341, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 58-0608.

58-06-09.
Audit accounts.

At the last regular meeting in each year, the board of township supervisors shall audit accounts, settle with the township overseer of highways, and transact any other business that may come before it.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 155, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 2595; R.C. 1899, § 2595; R.C. 1905, § 3130; C.L. 1913, § 4189; R.C. 1943, § 58-0609.

Cross-References.

Supervisors constitute a board of auditors, see N.D.C.C. § 58-11-01.

58-06-10.
Business with board — When to appear.

All persons having business to transact with the board of township supervisors shall appear before the board at any regular meeting or file such business with the township clerk to be laid before the board by the township clerk at its next meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 155, § 7; R.C. 1895, § 2597; R.C. 1899, § 2597; R.C. 1905, § 3132; C.L. 1913, § 4191; R.C. 1943, § 58-0610.